Utah statutes.
13-11-16.   Investigatory powers of enforcing authority.
(1) If, by his own inquiries or as a result of complaints, the enforcing
authority has reason to believe that a person has engaged in, is engaging in,
or is about to engage in an act or practice that violates this act, he may
administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses or matter, and collect
evidence.
(2)  If matter that the enforcing authority subpoenas is located outside this
state, the person subpoenaed may either make it available to the enforcing
authority at a convenient location within the state or pay the reasonable and
necessary expenses for the enforcing authority or his representative to
examine the matter at the place where it is located.  The enforcing authority
may designate representatives, including officials of the state in which the
matter is located, to inspect the matter on his behalf, and he may respond to
similar requests from officials of other states.
(3)  Upon failure of a person without lawful excuse to obey a subpoena and
upon reasonable notice to all persons affected, the enforcing authority may
apply to the court for an order compelling compliance.
(4) In the event a witness asserts a privilege against self-incrimination,
testimony and evidence from the witness may be compelled pursuant to Title 77,
Chapter 22b, Grants of Immunity.
